Tennessee, session 114, HB0074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 43-27-203(d), is amended by adding
the following language at the end of the subsection:
A person violating subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3) shall be sentenced to serve in the county
jail or workhouse not less than forty-eight (48) consecutive hours nor more than eleven
(11) months and twenty-nine (29) days and be fined not less than five hundred dollars
($500) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0074
000451
- 1 -